Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1514
Stay of execution; judgment liens not released.

Where a stay of execution has been taken, such confessed judgment shall not release any judgment lien by virtue of the original judgment for the amount then due. The officer holding the execution shall return thereon what amount was made from the principal debtor, and how much from the sureties.

Laws 1875, § 10, p. 51;

R.S.1913, § 8055;

C.S.1922, § 8996;

C.S.1929, § 20-1514;

R.S.1943, § 25-1514.

Remedy in aid of execution does not exclude relief in equity. Parsons v. Cathers, 92 Neb. 525, 138 N.W. 747 (1912).